Utah statutes.
16-10a-1402.   Authorization of dissolution after issuance of shares.
(1)  After shares have been issued, dissolution of a corporation may be
authorized in the manner provided in Subsection (2).
(2)  For a proposal to dissolve the corporation to be authorized:
(a)  the board of directors must recommend dissolution to the shareholders
unless the board of directors determines that because of a conflict of
interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and
communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders; and
(b)  the shareholders entitled to vote on the proposal must approve the
proposal to dissolve as provided in Subsection (5).
(3)  The board of directors may condition the effectiveness of the dissolution
on any basis.
(4)  The corporation shall give notice in accordance with Section 16-10a-705
to each shareholder entitled to vote on the proposal to dissolve, of the
proposed shareholders' meeting at which the proposal to dissolve will be voted
upon. The notice shall state that the purpose or one of the purposes of the
meeting is to consider the proposal to dissolve the corporation.
(5)  The proposal to dissolve must be approved by each voting group entitled
to vote separately on the proposal, by a majority of all the votes entitled to
be cast on the proposal by that voting group, unless a greater vote is
required by the articles of incorporation, the initial bylaws or the bylaws
amended pursuant to Section 16-10a-1021, or the board of directors acting
pursuant to Subsection (3).
